Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 4. Legal Separation.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4(a), ch. 80, SLA 2002, provides that the provisions of AS

25.24.400

—

25.24.460

apply “to complaints for legal separation, divorce, and annulment that are filed on or after September 18, 2002, and orders of legal separation issued on or after September 18, 2002.”
Section 4(b), ch. 80, SLA 2002, provides that an order of legal separation issued by a court in the state before September 18, 2002, “(1) is not subject to or rendered void by [AS

25.24.400

—

25.24.460

], and (2) remains enforceable between the parties regardless of whether the issuing court was authorized to issue the order.”

Sec. 25.24.400.
Complaint for legal separation.

A husband or a wife may separately or jointly file a complaint in the superior court for a legal separation. A legal separation may be granted no more than once to the same married couple.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 2002)

Sec. 25.24.410.
Grounds for a legal separation.

A legal separation may be granted by the court based on a finding that

an incompatibility of temperament exists between the parties; and

the continuation of the parties’ status as married persons preserves or protects significant legal, financial, social, or religious interests.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 2002)

Sec. 25.24.420.
Residency required.

One of the parties to a complaint for legal separation must be a resident of the state at the time the action is commenced.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 2002)

Sec. 25.24.430.
Consolidation of actions.

If, at any time, a party to an action for legal separation files an action for divorce or annulment, the court shall consolidate the new action with the action for legal separation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 2002)

Sec. 25.24.440.
Applicability of other statutes.

The following statutes relating to divorce actions shall be applied similarly to an action for legal separation: AS

25.24.060

,

25.24.140

,

25.24.150

,

25.24.152

,

25.24.160

, and

25.24.170

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 2002)

Sec. 25.24.450.
Decree.

If a court finds that the grounds specified under AS

25.24.410

exist, the court may enter a decree of legal separation.

Unless otherwise provided in the decree, provisions for child custody and visitation, child support, and spousal support included in a decree of legal separation are final orders subject to modification only as provided in AS

25.20.110

and AS

25.24.170

.

If the decree of legal separation includes provisions for division of property and debts of the marriage, the decree must state whether the division is an interim or final order. To the extent the division is not a final order, the court shall determine the parties’ respective rights to and responsibilities for property and obligations not finally distributed and as to any property or debts accrued by either party while the order is in effect.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 2002)

Sec. 25.24.460.
Effect of separation.

A decree of legal separation does not restore the parties to the status of unmarried persons. A decree of legal separation modifies the parties’ rights and responsibilities as married persons only to the extent specified in the decree of separation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 2002)